Louisiana, session 2026, HB896.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:250.4.1(B)(9) and (10) and (C) through (I) are hereby amended
and reenacted and R.S. 48:250.4.1(B)(11) through (14) and (J) through (M) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§250.4.1. State-owned toll facilities; toll collection and enforcement; toll signage;
toll dispute procedures; toll customer service centers
* * *
B. Terms as defined in R.S. 32.1 shall retained such definitions, except as
specifically defined in this Subsection. As used in this Section, unless the context
indicates otherwise, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(9) "Toll-by-plate" means the license plate tolling system that allows a
registered vehicle owner to receive a toll invoice by mail.
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
(10) "Toll collection facility" means any road, bridge, tunnel, or related
structure for which users pay a fee for passage.
(11) "Toll customer service center" means a facility used to assist drivers,
in person, regarding various tolling services, including but not limited to inquiries
on an existing account, account setup, service complaints, and payment processing.
(9) (12) "Toll tag" means an electronic device issued for use with an ETC on
any state-owned toll transportation facility.
(10) (13) "Valid toll-tag account" means a toll-tag account with the
department that has a balance of not less than fifty cents.
(14) "Vehicle class" means the system used to categorize vehicles based on
their dimensions, including height, width, and length.
C. The department or private entity acting on its behalf in the operation of
a toll facility shall erect toll signage to indicate the presence of a toll and the real-
time prices of the tolls based on the vehicles' class, rates for toll tag carriers, and toll-
by-plate rates for parish residents and nonresidents.
C. D.(1) No motor vehicle shall be driven and no motor vehicle or trailer
shall be towed through any state-owned toll collection facility without payment of
the proper toll, unless the vehicle falls under any exception provided in Subsection
M of this Section. If the proper toll is not paid, as evidenced by video or electronic
recording, the registered owner of such vehicle or trailer shall be liable to make
prompt payment to the department of the proper toll and an administrative fee of
twenty-five dollars to recover the cost of collecting the toll.
(2) A person who receives an invoice for the passage of a toll collection
facility shall, at no date later than the due date specified in the invoice, do the
following:
(a) Pay the amount owed as stated in the invoice.
(b) Send a written request to the department for a review of the toll
assessment contained in the invoice.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
(3) If a person fails to comply with this Subsection, the department may add
an administrative fee, not to exceed six dollars, to the amount owed. The department
shall:
(a) Set the administrative fee by rule in an amount that does not exceed the
cost of collecting the toll.
(b) Charge the person no more than forty-eight dollars in administrative fees
in a twelve-month period.
D. E. The registered owner is prima facie responsible for the payment of the
toll, administrative fees, and late charges that the department may assess pursuant
to this Section. It is not a defense to liability for payment under this Section that a
registered owner was not operating the motor vehicle or trailer at the time of the
failure to pay the toll, except that the registered owner shall not be liable under this
Section when the registered owner makes a report to a law enforcement officer or
agency that the motor vehicle or trailer was stolen before the failure to pay a toll
occurs or within forty-eight hours after the registered owner becomes aware of the
theft.
E. F.(1) The department shall adopt policies and procedures for the
collection of tolls, administrative fees, and late charges authorized pursuant to this
Section, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(2) No other tolls, fees, or other monetary impositions shall be collected by
the department or an authorized entity from a person's vehicle passage of a toll
facility unless expressly authorized by this Section.
(3) Any mailing costs assessed to the person charged for the toll shall not
exceed the actual cost of the postage.
F. G.(1) Failure to comply with the requirements of this Section shall result
in the following late charges or sanctions, or both, against the registered owner:
(a) The department may assess the following penalties for late payment, for
failure to pay, or for otherwise failing to respond, or both, against the registered
owner:
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
(i) A registered owner who fails to pay the administrative fees specified in
a violation notice and who fails to appeal a violation notice as provided by this
Section within thirty forty-five calendar days after the date of the issuance of the
violation notice shall incur a late charge of five dollars. A registered owner who fails
to respond to a violation notice within sixty calendar days after the date of issuance
of the violation notice shall not be able to renew his driver's license until all matters
regarding the alleged toll violation are disposed of in accordance with law. The
violation clerk shall notify the registered owner by first-class mail of this
delinquency and consequences thereof.
(ii) A registered owner who fails to respond to a violation notice as provided
by this Section within sixty calendar days after the date of the issuance of the
violation notice shall be prohibited from renewing his driver's license. The violation
clerk shall notify the Louisiana office of motor vehicles of this delinquency. Upon
notice from a violation clerk of the department, the office of motor vehicles shall
place the matter on record and shall not renew the driver's license of the registered
owner or the registration of the vehicle until after notice from the violation clerk that
the matters have been disposed of in accordance with law.
(b) After a notice to the office of motor vehicles provided in Item (a)(ii) of
this Paragraph, the department shall not be required to send violation notices of
delinquency to registered owners with ten or more toll violations. However, the tolls
and administrative fees of such registered owner shall continue to accumulate.
(2) The department may pursue such civil and criminal action as it deems
appropriate to collect the tolls and administrative fees assessed in the violation notice
as well as such subsequent late charges assessed in accordance with this Section.
G. H.(1) A photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image
produced by a photo-monitoring device is admissible in a proceeding to collect a toll
or other charge of the department, to collect criminal penalties imposed, or to impose
criminal liability for a failure to pay the toll or charge.
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
(2) An original or facsimile of a certificate, sworn to or affirmed by an agent
of the department that states that a failure to pay has occurred and states that it is
based upon a personal inspection of a photograph, microphotograph, videotape, or
other recorded image produced by a photo-monitoring system, as defined in this
Section, is prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the certificate.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a photograph,
microphotograph, videotape, or other recorded image prepared for enforcement of
tolls is for the exclusive use of the department in the discharge of its duties under this
Section.
H. I. The department shall from time to time designate one or more violation
clerks and agents to perform the functions specified in this Section at the pleasure
of the department and for such finite or indefinite period as the department deems
desirable. The department shall supervise and coordinate the processing of violation
notices in accordance with this Section. The department may hire or designate such
personnel and organize such sections as the department may consider necessary to
carry out the provisions of this Section.
J.(1) The person or entity alleged to be liable for the toll violation as the
vehicle owner may dispute the violation by submitting a declaration of dispute to the
authorized agent at the time and place and in the manner established by the
department together with a certification establishing the basis for the dispute. The
toll violation and associated fee shall be dismissed if:
(a) The person or entity was not the registered owner of the vehicle at the
time of the toll transaction that formed the basis of the alleged violation and the
person or entity submits the following to the authorized agent:
(i) A copy of the plate surrender receipt from the office of motor vehicles.
(ii) Proof of sale of the vehicle.
(b) The toll was paid by toll tag with the toll posted to a valid toll-tag
account and a copy of the toll statement showing the toll posting was submitted to
the authorized agent.
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
(c) The toll was paid in cash at the time and a copy of the toll receipt was
submitted to the authorized agent.
(d) The vehicle was not present at the facility at the time of the violation.
(e) For other good cause shown.
(2) If the owner is a vehicle rental or leasing company which seeks to
perform a transfer of responsibility to the vehicle lessee or renter, the owner shall
submit to the authorized agent at the time and place and in the manner established
in the notice of violation the signed lease or rental agreement and certification of the
name and address of the lessee or renter of the vehicle at the time of the toll
transaction that formed the basis for the violation. A notice of violation or toll
invoice shall be sent by the authorized agent to the lessee or renter within forty-five
days of receipt of the signed lease or rental agreement and certification and the lessee
or renter shall be deemed the owner of the vehicle and shall be liable for the payment
of toll and any toll violation fees.
(3) The authorized agent shall send the owner a written determination of the
declaration of dispute resulting from a request made pursuant to Paragraph (J)(1) of
this Section.
(a) The owner may request a review by the authority of the authorized
agent's determination by submitting a request for review to the authority at the place
and time and in the manner established in the authorized agent's written
determination of the declaration of dispute.
(b) The authorized agent's determination of the declaration of dispute shall
be final and binding on the owner unless overturned by the authority upon review.
K.(1) The department or a private entity acting on its behalf shall maintain
a toll customer service center within at least a five mile radius of an operational toll
facility.
(2) The entity receiving toll revenue and credits shall pay for the
construction, operation, and maintenance of the toll customer service center.
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896
I. L. The department may contract with an operating entity to carry out the
provisions of this Section, except for the provisions in Subsection F of this Section.
M.(1) The department shall develop and implement efficient policies and
procedures to ensure that vehicles falling under Subsection M of this Section shall
not be assessed toll passage fees and related administrative fees or fines as outlined
in this Section. The following vehicles shall not to be assessed toll passage fees and
related administrative fees or fines as follows:
(a) Vehicles owned by any federal, state, parish, or local governments or
their various departments.
(b) Vehicles associated with law enforcement pursuant to R.S. 40:1392.
(c) Vehicles owned by local municipality or parish police and firefighters in
parishes where the toll facility exists.
(d) Vehicles of any current government employees of the parish in which the
toll facility exists.
(e) Vehicles displaying a disabled-veteran license plate.
(f) Vehicles making one round-trip passage in a ninety day period traveling
through an unmanned toll collection facility. Notwithstanding the first round-trip,
vehicles that make more than one round-trip passage in a ninety day period shall be
charged for each passage.
(2) The exceptions contained in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection are limited
to two motor vehicles owned and registered by each government employee. These
employees shall provide proof of employment to the department or authorized
private entity upon request for verification purposes.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-107 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 896